Utah statutes.
17B-1-1303.   Initiation of dissolution process.

The process to dissolve a local district may be initiated by:

(1)  for an inactive local district:

(a) (i)  for a local district whose board of trustees is elected by electors based on the acre-feet of water allotted to the land owned by the elector, a petition signed by the owners of 25% of the acre-feet of water allotted to the land within the local district; or

(ii)  for all other districts:

(A)  a petition signed by the owners of private real property that:

(I)  is located within the local district proposed to be dissolved;

(II)  covers at least 25% of the private land area within the local district; and

(III)  is equal in assessed value to at least 25% of the assessed value of all private real property within the local district; or

(B)  a petition signed by registered voters residing within the local district proposed to be dissolved equal in number to at least 25% of the number of votes cast in the district for the office of governor at the last regular general election before the filing of the petition; or

(b)  a resolution adopted by the administrative body; and

(2)  for an active local district, a petition signed by:

(a)  for a local district whose board of trustees is elected by electors based on the acre-feet of water allotted to the land owned by the elector, a petition signed by the owners of 100% of the acre-feet of water allotted to the land within the local district; or

(b)  for all other districts, the owners of 100% of the private real property located within or 100% of registered voters residing within the local district proposed to be dissolved.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

